Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8914
Written policies and procedures required.

A veterinary drug distributor shall establish, maintain, and adhere to written policies and procedures for the receipt, storage, security, inventory, and distribution of veterinary legend drugs, including policies and procedures for identifying, recording, and reporting destruction, losses, or thefts of veterinary legend drugs and for correcting all errors and inaccuracies in inventories. The policies shall contain a provision for annual review at which time the policies shall be updated as necessary. A record documenting the review shall be kept with the policies and procedures and shall indicate the date of the review and the signature of the designated representative of the veterinary drug distributor.

Laws 2008, LB1022, § 14.